Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Supplement, 201923-402
Purpose of act.

The purpose of the County Civil Service Commission Act is to guarantee to all citizens a fair and equal opportunity for employment in the county offices governed by the act and to establish conditions of employment and to promote economy and efficiency in such offices. In addition, the purpose of the act is to establish a system of personnel administration that meets the social, economic, and program needs of county offices. Such system shall provide the means to recruit, select, develop, and maintain an effective and responsive workforce and shall include policies and procedures for employee hiring and advancement, training and career development, position classification, salary administration, benefits, discipline, discharge, and other related matters. All appointments and promotions under the act shall be made based on merit and fitness.

Laws 1971, LB 921, § 1;

R.S.1943, (2012), § 23-2501;

Laws 2019, LB411, § 2.